Utah statutes.
35A-2-103.   Advisory groups -- Creation.

(1)  The economic service area director may establish one or more advisory groups in each economic service area.

(2)  An advisory group established under Subsection (1) shall advise the economic service area director as needed on:

(a)  the economic service area's planning priorities;

(b)  training priorities; and

(c)  development of the economic service area plan.



Amended by Chapter 188, 2011 General Session

